apertium-en-hi.hi.dix
	<pardef n="ह/ैं__prn">
      <e><p><l>म</l><r>म<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>में</l><r>म<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>मको</l><r>म<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>मने</l><r>म<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>मारा</l><r>म<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>मारी</l><r>म<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>मारे</l><r>म<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 
    
	<pardef n="आ/ैं__prn">
      <e><p><l>प</l><r>प<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>पका</l><r>प<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>पको</l><r>प<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>पने</l><r>प<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>पकी</l><r>प<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	<pardef n="अ/ैं__prn">
      <e><p><l>पनी</l><r>प<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>पना</l><r>प<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>पने</l><r>प<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	<pardef n="इस/ैं__prn">
		<e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>े</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>की</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>के</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>का</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>को</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>से</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>	
		<e><p><l>ने</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>			

	</pardef>

	<pardef n="किस/ैं__prn">
	
		<e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>े</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>की</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>के</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>का</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>को</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>से</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>	
		<e><p><l>ने</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>			

	</pardef>
	
	<pardef n="इ/ैं__prn">
		<e><p><l>न</l><r>न<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="frm"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ने</l><r>न<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="frm"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>नकी</l><r>न<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="frm"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>नके</l><r>न<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="frm"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>नका</l><r>न<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="frm"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>नको</l><r>न<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="frm"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>नसे</l><r>न<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="frm"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>	
		<e><p><l>न्होंने</l><r>न<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="frm"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>			

	</pardef>

	<pardef n="कि/ैं__prn">
		<e><p><l>न</l><r>न<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="frm"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ने</l><r>न<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="frm"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>नकी</l><r>न<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="frm"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>नके</l><r>न<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="frm"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>नका</l><r>न<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="frm"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>नको</l><r>न<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="frm"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>नसे</l><r>न<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="frm"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>	
		<e><p><l>न्होंने</l><r>न<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="frm"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>			

	</pardef>

    <pardef n="यह__prn">       
		 <e><p><l>ह</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
         <e><p><l>े</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="int__prn">       
		 <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

	<pardef n="just__prn">       
		 <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	
    <!-- SECTION: Adverbs -->      
    <pardef n="गलत__adv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
         
    <pardef n="int__adv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
 
    <!-- SECTION: Conjunctions -->      

    <pardef n="और__cnjcoo">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
      
    <!-- SECTION:  Sub-ordinating Conjunctions -->      
    <pardef n="अगर__cnjsub">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjsub"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
   	
	<!-- SECTION:  Adverbial Conjunctions -->      
	<pardef n="क्योंकि__cnjadv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjadv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>  



	<!-- SECTION: Numerals -->

    <pardef n="आठ__num">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>वां</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="पहला__num">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	<pardef n="एक__num">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="परन्तु"><i>परन्तु</i><par n="और__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="और"><i>और</i><par n="और__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="अथवा"><i>अथवा</i><par n="और__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="तथा"><i>तथा</i><par n="और__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="एवं"><i>एवं</i><par n="और__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="पर"><i>पर</i><par n="और__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="मगर"><i>मगर</i><par n="और__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="या"><i>या</i><par n="और__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="लेकिन"><i>लेकिन</i><par n="और__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="कि"><i>कि</i><par n="अगर__cnjsub"/></e>
	<e lm="ताकि"><i>ताकि</i><par n="क्योंकि__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="यदि"><i>यदि</i><par n="क्योंकि__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="अगर"><i>अगर</i><par n="क्योंकि__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="क्योंकि"><i>क्योंकि</i><par n="क्योंकि__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="चूंकि"><i>चूंकि</i><par n="क्योंकि__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="इसलिए"><i>इसलिए</i><par n="क्योंकि__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="चाहे"><i>चाहे</i><par n="क्योंकि__cnjadv"/></e>
	<e lm="शुन्य"><i>शुन्य</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
	<e lm="सिफर"><i>सिफर</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
	<e lm="एक"><i>एक</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
	<e lm="दो"><i>दो</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
	<e lm="तीन"><i>तीन</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
	<e lm="चार"><i>चार</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
	<e lm="छः"><i>छः</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
	<e lm="दस"><i>दस</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="चौदह"><i>चौदह</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="अट्ठारह"><i>अट्ठारह</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="बाईस"><i>बाईस</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="छब्बीस"><i>छब्बीस</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="तीस"><i>तीस</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="चौंतीस"><i>चौंतीस</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="अड़तीस"><i>अड़तीस</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="बयालीस"><i>बयालीस</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="छियालीस"><i>छियालीस</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="पचास"><i>पचास</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="चउवन"><i>चउवन</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="अट्ठावन"><i>अट्ठावन</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="बासठ"><i>बासठ</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="छियासठ"><i>छियासठ</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="सत्तर"><i>सत्तर</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="चौहत्तर"><i>चौहत्तर</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="अठहत्तर"><i>अठहत्तर</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="बयासी"><i>बयासी</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="छियासी"><i>छियासी</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="चौरानवे"><i>चौरानवे</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
	<e lm="पहला"><i>पहला</i><par n="पहला__num"/></e>
	<e lm="प्रथम"><i>प्रथम</i><par n="पहला__num"/></e>
	<e lm="दूसरा"><i>दूसरा</i><par n="पहला__num"/></e>
	<e lm="द्वितीय"><i>द्वितीय</i><par n="पहला__num"/></e>
	<e lm="तीसरा"><i>तीसरा</i><par n="पहला__num"/></e>
	<e lm="तृतीय"><i>तृतीय</i><par n="पहला__num"/></e>
	<e lm="चौथा"><i>चौथा</i><par n="पहला__num"/></e>
	<e lm="चतुर्थ"><i>चतुर्थ</i><par n="पहला__num"/></e>
	<e lm="पंचम"><i>पंचम</i><par n="पहला__num"/></e>
	<e lm="छठा"><i>छठा</i><par n="पहला__num"/></e>
	<e lm="षष्ठ"><i>षष्ठ</i><par n="पहला__num"/></e>
	<e lm="सप्तम"><i>सप्तम</i><par n="पहला__num"/></e>
	<e lm="अष्टम"><i>अष्टम</i><par n="पहला__num"/></e>
	<e lm="नवम"><i>नवम</i><par n="पहला__num"/></e>
	<e lm="दशम"><i>दशम</i><par n="पहला__num"/></e>
	<e lm="आप"><i>आ</i><par n="आ/ैं__prn"/></e>
	<e lm="अप"><i>अ</i><par n="अ/ैं__prn"/></e>
	<e lm="हम"><i>ह</i><par n="ह/ैं__prn"/></e>
	<e lm="इस"><i>इस</i><par n="इस/ैं__prn"/></e>
	<e lm="उस"><i>उस</i><par n="इस/ैं__prn"/></e>
	<e lm="किस"><i>किस</i><par n="किस/ैं__prn"/></e>
	<e lm="जिस"><i>जिस</i><par n="किस/ैं__prn"/></e>
	<e lm="किन"><i>कि</i><par n="कि/ैं__prn"/></e>
	<e lm="इन"><i>इ</i><par n="इ/ैं__prn"/></e>
	<e lm="उन"><i>उ</i><par n="इ/ैं__prn"/></e>
	<e lm="जो"><i>जो</i><par n="int__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="य"><i>य</i><par n="यह__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="व"><i>व</i><par n="यह__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ओर"><i>ओर</i><par n="just__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="दूसरे"><i>दूसरे</i><par n="यह__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="कहॉं"><i>कहॉं</i><par n="int__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="कब "><i>कब</i><par n="int__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="क्यों"><i>क्यों</i><par n="int__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="क्या"><i>क्या</i><par n="int__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="जब"><i>जब</i><par n="int__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="भूग्रस्त"><i>भूग्रस्त</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="लगभग"><i>लगभग</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="दोहरा"><i>दोहरा</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="आगे"><i>आगे</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="अविध्वंसिता"><i>अविध्वंसिता</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="निश्चिंततापूर्वक"><i>निश्चिंततापूर्वक</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="सम्भवतः"><i>सम्भवतः</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="अलग"><i>अलग</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="जबरदस्त"><i>जबरदस्त</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="कल"><i>कल</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रफुल्लतापूर्वक"><i>प्रफुल्लतापूर्वक</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="मादा"><i>मादा</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="कलाकार-मंडली"><i>कलाकार-मंडली</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="उदारतापूर्वक"><i>उदारतापूर्वक</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रवीणतापूर्वक"><i>प्रवीणतापूर्वक</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="मध्यम"><i>मध्यम</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="शांतिपूर्वक"><i>शांतिपूर्वक</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="कोलाहलपूर्ण"><i>कोलाहलपूर्ण</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="बढिया"><i>बढिया</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="आतुरतापूर्वक"><i>आतुरतापूर्वक</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="वीरतापूर्वक"><i>वीरतापूर्वक</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
